Missouri, session 2026, HB2697.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.700, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 166.700, to read as follows:
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a particular content area or grade
level, including any supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section 160.011;
(3) "Educational assistance organization", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(4) "Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully present in the United States or any
person who gained illegal entry into the United States;
(5) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
(6) "Private school", a school that is not a part of the public school system of the state
of Missouri and that charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary educational
services;
(7) "Program", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
(8) "Qualified school", an FPE school or any of the following entities that is
incorporated in Missouri and that does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or national
origin:
(a) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2697 2
(b) A private school;
(c) A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
(d) A public or private virtual school;
(9) "Qualified student", any elementary or secondary school student who is a resident
of this state[,] and who is not an illegal alien[, and who:
(a) Has an approved "individualized education plan " (IEP) developed under the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq.,
as amended; or
(b) is a member of a household whose total annual income does not exceed an amount
equal to three hundred percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and reduced
price lunches, and that meets at least one of the following qualifications:
a. Attended a public school as a full-time student for at least one semester during the
previous twelve months;
b. Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or first grade under sections 160.051
to 160.055; or
c. Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a scholarship grant in the previous
school year and will receive a scholarship grant in the current school year].
✔